Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.065

Fundamental course of study—In-person requirements—Exemption.

(1) By July 1, 2025, the board must update rules on the implementation of the fundamental course of study under RCW 28A.413.060 to require that a significant majority of paraeducators are provided with the course in person. Under the rules, the board may grant an exemption from the in-person requirement of RCW 28A.413.060 for second-class school districts hiring paraeducators after the beginning of the school year.

(2) By July 1, 2025, the board must publish guidance for school districts on how to provide the fundamental course of study under RCW 28A.413.060 to improve the consistency and quality of staff development.

[ 2024 c 173 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2024 c 173: "(1) The legislature acknowledges that it created the paraeducator board to adopt standards of practice and required school districts to provide to paraeducators a four-day fundamental course of study on the standards to paraeducators. The legislature finds that it required that at least one day of the fundamental course of study be provided in person due to the benefits of in-person instruction, including that instructors can confirm the participant's application of learning objectives.

(2) The legislature recognizes that paraeducators benefit from in-person training that is part of the hiring and onboarding process. The legislature intends to expand this benefit by generally requiring two days of the fundamental course of study be provided to paraeducators in person. The legislature recognizes that an exemption from this in-person requirement is necessary for some small school districts that experience barriers to providing the fundamental course of study in person due to long commute times for paraeducators, irregular hiring dates in small school districts, and other extenuating circumstances.

(3) However, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that all paraeducators in Washington receive high quality and consistent professional development through the fundamental course of study, with a significant majority of paraeducators being trained in person." [ 2024 c 173 s 1.]